resources/dicts/fr-classique+reforme1990.aff
FLAG long
SFX yN Y 36
SFX yN truire truire/12 uire 64
SFX yN truire truisant/12 uire 48
SFX yN truire truit uire 85
SFX yN truire truits uire 86
SFX yN truire truite uire 80
SFX yN truire truites uire 81
SFX yN truire truit/12 uire 21
SFX yN truire truisons uire 56
SFX yN truire truisez uire 72
SFX yN truire truisent/12 uire 26
SFX yN truire truisait/12 uire 50
SFX yN truire truisions uire 77
SFX yN truire truisiez uire 76
SFX yN truire truisaient/12 uire 51
SFX yN truire truisit/12 uire 53
SFX yN truire truisîmes uire 63
SFX yN truire truisîtes uire 62
SFX yN truire truisirent/12 uire 71
SFX yN truire truira/12 uire 22
SFX yN truire truirons uire 31
SFX yN truire truirez uire 30
SFX yN truire truiront/12 uire 24
SFX yN truire truirait/12 uire 23
SFX yN truire truirions uire 33
SFX yN truire truiriez uire 32
SFX yN truire truiraient/12 uire 25
SFX yN truire truise/12 uire 27
SFX yN truire truisions uire 74
SFX yN truire truisiez uire 73
SFX yN truire truisent/12 uire 28
SFX yN truire truisît/12 uire 52
SFX yN truire truisissions uire 60
SFX yN truire truisissiez uire 59
SFX yN truire truisissent/12 uire 54
SFX yN truire truisons-nous uire 178
SFX yN truire truisez-vous uire 177

SFX yO Y 51
SFX yO détruire détruire/59 détruire 64
SFX yO détruire détruisant/59 détruire 48
SFX yO détruire détruit détruire 85
SFX yO détruire détruits détruire 86
SFX yO détruire détruite détruire 80
SFX yO détruire détruites détruire 81
SFX yO détruire détruis/24 détruire 34
SFX yO détruire détruis/21 détruire 35
SFX yO détruire détruit/12 détruire 21
SFX yO détruire détruisons détruire 56
SFX yO détruire détruisez détruire 72
SFX yO détruire détruisent/12 détruire 26
SFX yO détruire détruisais/24 détruire 66
SFX yO détruire détruisais/21 détruire 65
SFX yO détruire détruisait/12 détruire 50
SFX yO détruire détruisions détruire 77
SFX yO détruire détruisiez détruire 76
SFX yO détruire détruisaient/12 détruire 51
SFX yO détruire détruisis/24 détruire 69
SFX yO détruire détruisis/21 détruire 68
SFX yO détruire détruisit/12 détruire 53
SFX yO détruire détruisîmes détruire 63
SFX yO détruire détruisîtes détruire 62
SFX yO détruire détruisirent/12 détruire 71
SFX yO détruire détruirai/24 détruire 38
SFX yO détruire détruiras/21 détruire 37
SFX yO détruire détruira/12 détruire 22
SFX yO détruire détruirons détruire 31
SFX yO détruire détruirez détruire 30
SFX yO détruire détruiront/12 détruire 24
SFX yO détruire détruirais/24 détruire 40
SFX yO détruire détruirais/21 détruire 39
SFX yO détruire détruirait/12 détruire 23
SFX yO détruire détruirions détruire 33
SFX yO détruire détruiriez détruire 32
SFX yO détruire détruiraient/12 détruire 25
SFX yO détruire détruise/24 détruire 41
SFX yO détruire détruises/21 détruire 44
SFX yO détruire détruise/12 détruire 27
SFX yO détruire détruisions détruire 74
SFX yO détruire détruisiez détruire 73
SFX yO détruire détruisent/12 détruire 28
SFX yO détruire détruisisse/24 détruire 61
SFX yO détruire détruisisses/21 détruire 67
SFX yO détruire détruisît/12 détruire 52
SFX yO détruire détruisissions détruire 60
SFX yO détruire détruisissiez détruire 59
SFX yO détruire détruisissent/12 détruire 54
SFX yO détruire détruis/21 détruire 36
SFX yO détruire détruisons détruire 58
SFX yO détruire détruisez détruire 75

SFX yU N 48
SFX yU uire uire uire 64
SFX yU uire uisant uire 48
SFX yU uire ui uire 106
SFX yU uire uis uire 34
SFX yU uire uis uire 35
SFX yU uire uit uire 21
SFX yU uire uisons uire 56
SFX yU uire uisez uire 72
SFX yU uire uisent uire 26
SFX yU uire uisais uire 66
SFX yU uire uisais uire 65
SFX yU uire uisait uire 50
SFX yU uire uisions uire 77
SFX yU uire uisiez uire 76
SFX yU uire uisaient uire 51
SFX yU uire uisis uire 69
SFX yU uire uisis uire 68
SFX yU uire uisit uire 53
SFX yU uire uisîmes uire 63
SFX yU uire uisîtes uire 62
SFX yU uire uisirent uire 71
SFX yU uire uirai uire 38
SFX yU uire uiras uire 37
SFX yU uire uira uire 22
SFX yU uire uirons uire 31
SFX yU uire uirez uire 30
SFX yU uire uiront uire 24
SFX yU uire uirais uire 40
SFX yU uire uirais uire 39
SFX yU uire uirait uire 23
SFX yU uire uirions uire 33
SFX yU uire uiriez uire 32
SFX yU uire uiraient uire 25
SFX yU uire uise uire 41
SFX yU uire uises uire 44
SFX yU uire uise uire 27
SFX yU uire uisions uire 74
SFX yU uire uisiez uire 73
SFX yU uire uisent uire 28
SFX yU uire uisisse uire 61
SFX yU uire uisisses uire 67
SFX yU uire uisît uire 52
SFX yU uire uisissions uire 60
SFX yU uire uisissiez uire 59
SFX yU uire uisissent uire 54
SFX yU uire uis uire 36
SFX yU uire uisons uire 58
SFX yU uire uisez uire 75

SFX yV N 55
SFX yV ire ire ire 64
SFX yV ire isant ire 48
SFX yV ire it nfire 85
SFX yV ire its nfire 86
SFX yV ire ite nfire 80
SFX yV ire ites nfire 81
SFX yV ire is cire 121
SFX yV ire ise cire 80
SFX yV ire ises cire 81
SFX yV ire i ffire 106
SFX yV ire is ire 34
SFX yV ire is ire 35
SFX yV ire it ire 21
SFX yV ire isons ire 56
SFX yV ire isez ire 72
SFX yV ire isent ire 26
SFX yV ire isais ire 66
SFX yV ire isais ire 65
SFX yV ire isait ire 50
SFX yV ire isions ire 77
SFX yV ire isiez ire 76
SFX yV ire isaient ire 51
SFX yV ire is ire 69
SFX yV ire is ire 68
SFX yV ire it ire 53
SFX yV ire îmes ire 63
SFX yV ire îtes ire 62
SFX yV ire irent ire 71
SFX yV ire irai ire 38
SFX yV ire iras ire 37
SFX yV ire ira ire 22
SFX yV ire irons ire 31
SFX yV ire irez ire 30
SFX yV ire iront ire 24
SFX yV ire irais ire 40
SFX yV ire irais ire 39
SFX yV ire irait ire 23
SFX yV ire irions ire 33
SFX yV ire iriez ire 32
SFX yV ire iraient ire 25
SFX yV ire ise ire 41
SFX yV ire ises ire 44
SFX yV ire ise ire 27
SFX yV ire isions ire 74
SFX yV ire isiez ire 73
SFX yV ire isent ire 28
SFX yV ire isse ire 61
SFX yV ire isses ire 67
SFX yV ire ît ire 52
SFX yV ire issions ire 60
SFX yV ire issiez ire 59
SFX yV ire issent ire 54
SFX yV ire is ire 36
SFX yV ire isons ire 58
SFX yV ire isez ire 75

SFX yW N 48
SFX yW ire ire rire 64
SFX yW ire iant rire 48
SFX yW ire i rire 106
SFX yW ire is rire 34
SFX yW ire is rire 35
SFX yW ire it rire 21
SFX yW ire ions rire 56
SFX yW ire iez rire 72
SFX yW ire ient rire 26
SFX yW ire iais rire 66
SFX yW ire iais rire 65
SFX yW ire iait rire 50
SFX yW ire iions rire 77
SFX yW ire iiez rire 76
SFX yW ire iaient rire 51
SFX yW ire is rire 69
SFX yW ire is rire 68
SFX yW ire it rire 53
SFX yW ire îmes rire 63
SFX yW ire îtes rire 62
SFX yW ire irent rire 71
SFX yW ire irai rire 38
SFX yW ire iras rire 37
SFX yW ire ira rire 22
SFX yW ire irons rire 31
SFX yW ire irez rire 30
SFX yW ire iront rire 24
SFX yW ire irais rire 40
SFX yW ire irais rire 39
SFX yW ire irait rire 23
SFX yW ire irions rire 33
SFX yW ire iriez rire 32
SFX yW ire iraient rire 25
SFX yW ire ie rire 41
SFX yW ire ies rire 44
SFX yW ire ie rire 27
SFX yW ire iions rire 74
SFX yW ire iiez rire 73
SFX yW ire ient rire 28
SFX yW ire isse rire 61
SFX yW ire isses rire 67
SFX yW ire ît rire 52
SFX yW ire issions rire 60
SFX yW ire issiez rire 59
SFX yW ire issent rire 54
SFX yW ire is rire 36
SFX yW ire ions rire 58
SFX yW ire iez rire 75

SFX yX Y 33
SFX yX nuire nuire/12 nuire 64
SFX yX nuire nuisant/12 nuire 48
SFX yX nuire nui nuire 106
SFX yX nuire nuit/12 nuire 21
SFX yX nuire nuisons nuire 56
SFX yX nuire nuisez nuire 72
SFX yX nuire nuisent/12 nuire 26
SFX yX nuire nuisait/12 nuire 50
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire 77
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire 76
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/12 nuire 51
SFX yX nuire nuisit/12 nuire 53
SFX yX nuire nuisîmes nuire 63
SFX yX nuire nuisîtes nuire 62
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/12 nuire 71
SFX yX nuire nuira/12 nuire 22
SFX yX nuire nuirons nuire 31
SFX yX nuire nuirez nuire 30
SFX yX nuire nuiront/12 nuire 24
SFX yX nuire nuirait/12 nuire 23
SFX yX nuire nuirions nuire 33
SFX yX nuire nuiriez nuire 32
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/12 nuire 25
SFX yX nuire nuise/12 nuire 27
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire 74
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire 73
SFX yX nuire nuisent/12 nuire 28
SFX yX nuire nuisît/12 nuire 52
SFX yX nuire nuisissions nuire 60
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez nuire 59
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/12 nuire 54
SFX yX nuire nuisons-nous nuire 178
SFX yX nuire nuisez-vous nuire 177

SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/53 occire 64
SFX yY ccire ccis/28 occire 121
SFX yY ccire ccise/28 occire 80
SFX yY ccire ccises/28 occire 81

SFX yZ N 16
SFX yZ rire rire rire 64
SFX yZ rire risant rire 48
SFX yZ rire rit rire 85
SFX yZ rire rits rire 86
SFX yZ rire rite rire 80
SFX yZ rire rites rire 81
SFX yZ rire ris rire 34
SFX yZ rire ris rire 35
SFX yZ rire rit rire 21
SFX yZ rire rirai rire 38
SFX yZ rire riras rire 37
SFX yZ rire rira rire 22
SFX yZ rire rirais rire 40
SFX yZ rire rirais rire 39
SFX yZ rire rirait rire 23
SFX yZ rire ris rire 36

SFX q+ Y 36
SFX q+ enir enu/28 enir 85
SFX q+ enir enus/28 enir 86
SFX q+ enir enue/28 enir 80
SFX q+ enir enues/28 enir 81
SFX q+ tir ti/28 tir 85
SFX q+ tir tis/28 tir 86
SFX q+ tir tie/28 tir 80
SFX q+ tir ties/28 tir 81
SFX q+ courir couru/28 courir 85
SFX q+ courir courus/28 courir 86
SFX q+ courir courue/28 courir 80
SFX q+ courir courues/28 courir 81
SFX q+ ivre écu vivre 85
SFX q+ ivre écus vivre 86
SFX q+ ivre écue vivre 80
SFX q+ ivre écues vivre 81
SFX q+ aire u aire 85
SFX q+ aire us aire 86
SFX q+ aire ue aire 80
SFX q+ aire ues aire 81
SFX q+ dre du dre 85
SFX q+ dre dus dre 86
SFX q+ dre due dre 80
SFX q+ dre dues dre 81
SFX q+ valoir valu .valoir 85
SFX q+ valoir valus .valoir 86
SFX q+ valoir value .valoir 80
SFX q+ valoir values .valoir 81
SFX q+ aître u/28 aître 85
SFX q+ aître us/28 aître 86
SFX q+ aître ue/28 aître 80
SFX q+ aître ues/28 aître 81
SFX q+ aitre u/28 aitre 85
SFX q+ aitre us/28 aitre 86
SFX q+ aitre ue/28 aitre 80
SFX q+ aitre ues/28 aitre 81

SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/28 enir 106
SFX q. tir ti/28 tir 106
SFX q. courir couru/28 courir 106
SFX q. ivre écu vivre 106
SFX q. aire u aire 106
SFX q. dre du dre 106
SFX q. valoir valu/28 .valoir 106
SFX q. aître u/28 aître 106
SFX q. aitre u/28 aitre 106
